Illinois, session 104th, HB2902.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Municipal and Cooperative Electric Utility Planning and 6Transparency Act. 7    Section 5. Legislative findings and objectives. The 8General Assembly finds:9        (1) Municipal and cooperative electric utilities 10    provide electricity to more than 1,000,000 State 11    residents.12        (2) These utilities are managed by elected officials, 13    elected board members, or their appointees. Due to their 14    governance structures, municipal and cooperative electric 15    utilities are exempt from certain regulatory requirements 16    and oversight under State and federal law.17        (3) State residents who are served by these utilities, 18    and who pay rates for electricity set by these utilities, 19    often lack access to important information about these 20    utilities' generation portfolios, procurement, management 21    practices, and budgets. Because democratic elections by 22    member-ratepayers or customers are the ultimate guarantor 23    of the integrity and cost-effectiveness of these   HB2902- 2 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1    utilities' operations, access to this information is 2    crucial to ensuring management of these utilities is 3    prudent and responsive.4        (4) Good utility practice entails long-term planning 5    on the part of a utility, including anticipating 6    retirement of existing generation resources, planning new 7    generation build or purchase well in advance of any 8    capacity shortfall, and developing rigorous estimates of 9    future load to inform procurement, construction, and 10    retirement decisions.11        (5) In many other states, integrated resource planning 12    processes have been used to avoid capacity shortfalls, 13    minimize ratepayer costs, and increase public 14    participation in and knowledge of electric generation 15    portfolio choices, even where the planning utility is not 16    otherwise subject to rate approval by the state.17        (6) It is in the best interests of State electricity 18    customers and member-ratepayers that electricity is 19    provided by a portfolio of generation and storage 20    resources and demand-side programs that minimizes both 21    cost and environmental impacts and that long-term utility 22    planning can and should facilitate the achievement of such 23    portfolios.24        (7) With the enactment of the Inflation Reduction Act 25    of 2022, municipal and cooperative electric utilities have 26    access to a variety of federal funding streams designed to   HB2902- 3 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1    facilitate transition from fossil fuel to renewable 2    generation. Consistent with Congress's intent, municipal 3    and cooperative electric utilities should perform a 4    comprehensive analysis of their existing portfolio and 5    have a duty, as utility managers, to identify 6    opportunities to minimize member-ratepayer and customer 7    costs.8        (8) To ensure utilities minimize ratepayer costs, 9    maximize opportunities for transition from fossil fuels to 10    renewable resources, and to increase transparency and 11    democratic participation, it is important that municipal 12    and cooperative electric utilities participate in an 13    integrated resource planning process with public 14    participation and Illinois Power Agency oversight. 15    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:16    "Agency" means the Illinois Power Agency.17    "Demand-side program" means a program implemented by or on 18behalf of a utility to reduce retail customer consumption 19(MWh) or shift the time of consumption of energy (MW) from end 20users, including energy efficiency programs, demand response 21programs, and programs for the promotion or aggregation of 22distributed generation.23    "Electric cooperative" has the meaning given to that term 24in Section 3-119 of the Public Utilities Act.25    "Generation resource" means a facility for the generation   HB2902- 4 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1of electricity.2    "Municipal power agency" has the meaning given to that 3term in Section 11-119.1-3 of the Illinois Municipal Code.4    "Municipality" has the meaning given to that term in 5Section 11-119.1-3 of the Illinois Municipal Code.6    "Renewable generation resource" means a resource for 7generating electricity that uses wind, solar, or geothermal 8energy.9    "Storage resource" means a commercially available 10technology that uses mechanical, chemical, or thermal 11processes to store energy and deliver the stored energy as 12electricity for use at a later time and is capable of being 13controlled by the distribution or transmission entity managing 14it, to enable and optimize the safe and reliable operation of 15the electric system.16    "Utility" means a municipal power agency, municipality, or 17electric cooperative.  18    Section 15. Purpose and contents of integrated resource 19plan.20    (a) Beginning on November 1, 2025, and every 3 years 21thereafter on November 1, all electric cooperatives with 22members in this State, municipal power agencies, and 23municipalities shall file with the Agency an integrated 24resource plan, except that municipalities and electric 25cooperatives that are members of, and have a full requirements   HB2902- 5 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1contract with, a municipal power agency or electric 2cooperative subject to this Act may file a statement adopting 3such other utility's integrated resource plan.4    (b) The purposes of the integrated resource plan are to 5provide a comprehensive description of the utility's current 6portfolio of electrical generation, storage, demand-side 7programs, and transmission resources, to forecast future load 8changes to facilitate prudent planning with respect to 9resource procurement and retirement, to determine what 10resource portfolio will meet ratepayers' needs while 11minimizing cost and environmental impact, and to articulate 12steps the utility will take to reduce customer costs and 13environmental impacts through changes to its current 14generation portfolio through construction, procurement, 15retirement, or demand-side programs.16    (c) As part of the integrated resource plan development 17process, a utility shall consider all resources reasonably 18available or reasonably likely to be available during the 19relevant time period to satisfy the demand for electricity 20services for a 20-year planning period, taking into account 21both supply-side and demand-side electric power resources. 22    (d) An integrated resource plan shall include, at a 23minimum:24        (1) A list of all electricity generation facilities 25    owned by the utility, in whole or in part. For each such 26    facility, the integrated resource plan shall report:  HB2902- 6 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1            (A) general location;2            (B) ownership information, if ownership is shared 3        with another entity;4            (C) type of fuel;5            (D) the date of commercial operation;6            (E) expected useful life;7            (F) expected retirement date for any resource 8        expected to retire within the next 10 years, and an 9        explanation of the reason for the retirement;10            (G) nameplate and peak available capacity;11            (H) total MWh generated at the facility during the 12        previous calendar year;13            (I) the date on which the facility is anticipated 14        to be fully depreciated; and15            (J) any compliance obligations, or compliance 16        obligations expected to apply within the next 10 17        years, and any proposed or anticipated expenditures 18        intended to meet those obligations.19        (2) A list of all power purchase agreements to which 20    the utility is a party, whether as purchaser or seller, 21    including the counterparty, general location and type of 22    generation resource providing power per the agreement, 23    date on which the agreement was entered into, duration of 24    the agreement, and the energy and capacity terms of the 25    agreement.26        (3) A list of any sale transactions of any energy or   HB2902- 7 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1    capacity to any purchaser.2        (4) A list of any demand-side programs and total 3    distributed generation.4        (5) A narrative description of all existing 5    transmission facilities owned by the utility, in whole or 6    in part, that identifies any transmission constraints or 7    critical contingencies, and identification of the regional 8    transmission organization, if any, which exercises 9    operational control over the transmission facility.10        (6) A list of all capital expenditures exceeding 11    $1,000,000 in the previous calendar year that includes a 12    brief description of the expenditure, the total amount 13    expended, and whether the expenditure was required to 14    conform with State or federal law, rule, or regulation;15        (7) A description of all transmission costs, 16    disaggregated by expenditure, that identifies all capital 17    expenditures on physical infrastructure and contracts for 18    rights costing greater than $1,000,000 over the term of 19    the agreement.20        (8) A copy of the most recent FERC Form 1 filed by the 21    utility. If no such FERC Form 1 has been filed, the utility 22    shall complete a FERC Form 1 for the prior calendar year.23        (9) A range of load forecasts for the 5-year planning 24    period that includes hourly data representing a high-load, 25    low-load, and expected-load scenario for all retail 26    customers, consistent with the requirements of paragraph   HB2902- 8 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1    (1) of subsection (d) of Section 16-111.5 of the Public 2    Utilities Act and any associated rules or regulations. 3    Such forecasts shall include:4            (A) all underlying assumptions;5            (B) an hourly load analysis consistent with the 6        requirements of paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of 7        Section 16-111.5 of the Public Utilities Act;8            (C) analysis of the impact of any demand-side 9        programs, consistent with paragraph (2) of subsection 10        (b) of Section 16-111.5 of the Public Utilities Act;11            (D) any reserve margin or other obligations placed 12        on the utility by regional transmission organizations 13        to which it is a member; and14            (E) to the extent the information is available, an 15        assessment of the accuracy of any past load forecasts 16        submitted pursuant to this Section and an explanation 17        of any deviation of greater than 10% in either 18        direction from the forecasted load.19        (10) The results of an all-source request for 20    proposals for generation resources and capacity contracts.21        (11) A 5-year action plan for meeting the forecasted 22    load that minimizes customer cost and adverse 23    environmental impacts. As part of the action plan, the 24    utility shall:25            (A) Identify any generation or storage resources 26        anticipated to be removed from service in the 5 years   HB2902- 9 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1        following the date on which the integrated resource 2        plan is submitted.3            (B) Determine whether given forecasted load growth 4        or unit retirements, or both, the utility will need to 5        procure additional capacity and energy, and provide a 6        quantitative estimate of any such gap between 7        forecasted load and supply-side resources.8            (C) Provide a narrative description of the 9        utility's process for evaluating possible resources to 10        secure this additional capacity and energy.11            (D) Provide a narrative description of the 12        utility's processes for assessing the present economic 13        value of existing generation and state whether, 14        consistent with this methodology, any currently 15        operating units, if any, could be replaced by other 16        resources at lower cost to ratepayers.17            (E) Identify a preferred portfolio of generation, 18        storage, and demand-side programs that, in the 19        utility's judgment, meets its forecasted load while 20        minimizing the ratepayer cost and environmental 21        impacts to the extent reasonably achievable in the 5 22        years covered by the action plan. The portfolio shall 23        incorporate any capacity or other reliability 24        requirements of any regional transmission organization 25        of which the utility is a member.26            (F) If the preferred portfolio includes the   HB2902- 10 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1        construction of new generation or storage resources or 2        transmission facilities, identify the preferred site 3        for all new construction of generation, storage, or 4        transmission facilities.5            (G) If the utility states that it intends to 6        remove a generation resource from service, include in 7        the integrated resource plan a statement describing 8        the utility's plan to minimize economic impacts to 9        workers due to facility retirement. This statement 10        shall include a description of:11                (i) the utility's efforts to collaborate with 12            the workers and their designated representatives, 13            if any;14                (ii) a transition timeline or date certain on 15            which such a transition timeline shall be made 16            available to ensure certainty for workers;17                (iii) the utility's efforts to protect pension 18            benefits and extend or replace health insurance, 19            life insurance, and other employment benefits;20                (iv) all training and skill development 21            programs to be made available for workers who will 22            see their employment reduced or eliminated as a 23            result of the retirement; and24                (v) any agreements with local governments 25            regarding continuing tax or other transfer 26            payments following the facility's retirement   HB2902- 11 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1            intended to minimize the impact on local services.2            (H) Describe any anticipated capital expenditures 3        in excess of $1,000,000 at existing generation 4        facilities and the reason for such expenditures.5        (12) A description of all models and methodologies 6    used in performing the integrated resource planning 7    process. The utility shall provide to the Agency, upon 8    request, reasonable access to any computer models used in 9    the analysis and workpapers, in electronic form, relied on 10    in preparation of the report.11    (e) As part of all integrated resource plans submitted in 122026, the utility shall identify all programs, grants, loans, 13or tax benefits for which the utility is eligible pursuant to 14the Inflation Reduction Act of 2022, and state whether the 15utility has applied for or otherwise used the program, grant, 16loan, or tax benefit. If the utility has not yet applied for or 17utilized the benefit, the utility shall state whether it 18intends to do so.19    (f) Each utility shall submit, as part of its integrated 20resource plan, a least cost plan for constructing or procuring 21renewable energy resources to meet a minimum percentage of its 22load for all retail customers as follows: 25% by June 1, 2027, 23increasing by at least 3% each delivery year thereafter to at 24least 40% by the 2031 delivery year, and continuing at no less 25than 40% for each delivery year thereafter.26    (g) Beginning in 2032, each utility shall submit, as part   HB2902- 12 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1of its integrated resource plan, a least cost plan for 2supplying 100% of its total projected load through renewable 3generation resources in combination with storage resources and 4demand-side programs by 2045. This least cost plan shall 5provide for the retirement of all coal and gas generation 6resources by January 1, 2046.7    (h) The Agency may adopt rules establishing additional 8requirements as to the form and content of integrated resource 9plans, including, but not limited to, specifying forecast 10methodologies. 11    Section 20. Stakeholder process. Prior to the submission 12of an integrated resource plan, a municipality, municipal 13power agency, or electric cooperative required to submit an 14integrated resource plan shall hold at least 2 stakeholders 15meetings open to all ratepayers and members of the public. 16Notice of the meetings shall be sent to all customers not less 17than 30 days prior to the meeting. During the meetings the 18utility shall describe its processes for developing the 19integrated resource plan and its core assumptions and 20constraints, present its proposed preferred portfolio, and 21describe any planned retirements, capital expenditures on 22existing generation resources likely to exceed $1,000,000, and 23planned construction. Each meeting shall allow time for public 24comment and the utility shall provide attendees with a means 25of providing public comment in writing following the meeting.   HB2902- 13 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1    Section 25. Procedures for submission of integrated 2resource plan.3    (a) Each municipality, municipal power agency, and 4electric cooperative shall submit its integrated resource 5plan, as set forth in this Act, to the Agency by October 1 of 6the calendar year.7    (b) The Agency may request further information from the 8utility. Any such requests shall be made in writing. If the 9Agency requests additional information, the utility shall 10provide responses no later than 15 days following the request.11    (c) The Agency shall facilitate public comment on the 12integrated resource plan, as follows:13        (1) upon submission of the integrated resource plan, 14    the Agency shall post the integrated resource plan 15    publicly on its website. The plan shall remain publicly 16    accessible for at least 60 days.17        (2) the utility shall hold at least 2 public meetings, 18    one in person and one remotely, where it shall make a 19    representative available to address questions about the 20    resource plan. The meetings shall be held no sooner than 21    15 days, and no later than 45 days, after the integrated 22    resource plan is made available to the public.23        (3) the Agency shall accept public comments on the 24    integrated resource plan for 60 days following its public 25    posting via website, email, or mail. The Agency may extend   HB2902- 14 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1    this public comment period by an additional 60 days upon 2    request by members of the public; and3        (4) after the conclusion of the public comment period, 4    as determined by the Agency, the Agency shall transmit 5    copies of all public comments received to the utility.6    (d) The utility shall review public comments and provide 7responses that reasonably address all issues or questions 8raised by such comments. The utility may modify its integrated 9resource plan in response to these comments. The utility shall 10prepare a document with responses to public comments and 11submit this response document to the Agency no later than 90 12days after receiving the comments from the agency. This 13response document shall be posted publicly on the Agency's 14website along with the original integrated resource plan, as 15submitted, and any revisions made by the utility in response 16to public comments.17    (e) The Agency shall maintain public access to all 18integrated resource plans submitted pursuant to this Act, 19accessible through the Agency's website, for no less than 10 20years following each integrated resource plan's initial 21submission. 22    Section 30. Use of independent expert.23    (a) The Agency shall maintain a list of qualified experts 24or expert consulting firms for the purpose of developing 25integrated resource plans on behalf of municipalities,   HB2902- 15 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1municipal power agencies, and cooperatives. In order to 2qualify an expert or expert consulting firm must have:3        (1) direct previous experience assembling power supply 4    plans or portfolios for utilities;5        (2) an advanced degree in economics, mathematics, 6    engineering, risk management, or a related area of study;7        (3) 10 years of experience in the electricity sector;8        (4) expertise in wholesale electricity market rules, 9    including those established by the federal Energy 10    Regulatory Commission and regional transmission 11    organizations; and12        (5) adequate resources to perform and fulfill the 13    required functions and responsibilities.14    (b) The Agency may assemble the list as part of the process 15for developing a list of qualified experts for experts to 16develop procurement plans, as set forth in subsection (a) of 17Section 1-75 of the Illinois Power Agency Act.18    (c) The Agency shall provide affected utilities and other 19interested parties with the lists of qualified experts or 20expert consulting firms identified through the request for 21qualifications processes that are under consideration to 22prepare the integrated resource plan on behalf of the utility. 23The Agency shall also provide each qualified expert's or 24expert consulting firm's response to the request for 25qualifications. A utility shall, within 5 business days, 26notify the Agency in writing if it objects to any experts or   HB2902- 16 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1expert consulting firms on the lists. Objections shall be 2based on:3        (1) the failure to satisfy qualification criteria;4        (2) the identification of a conflict of interest; or5        (3) the evidence of inappropriate bias for or against 6    potential bidders or the affected utilities.7    The Agency shall remove experts or expert consulting firms 8from the lists within 10 days if there is a reasonable basis 9for an objection and provide the updated lists to the affected 10utilities and other interested parties. If the Agency fails to 11remove an expert or expert consulting firm from the list, the 12objecting utility may withdraw its application and develop its 13integrated resource plan without agency assistance.14    (d) A utility required to submit an integrated resource 15plan may elect to rely on an expert or expert consulting firm 16selected by the Agency to develop the plan and conduct 17stakeholder processes.18    (e) A utility may submit a request to the Agency, not less 19than 6 months prior to the date on which the integrated 20resource plan is due, for such an expert or expert consulting 21firm.22    (f) Upon receipt of such a request, the Agency shall issue 23requests for proposals to the qualified experts on the list 24assembled as set forth in subsections (a) through (c) to 25develop an integrated resource plan for that utility. The 26Agency shall select an expert or expert consulting firm to   HB2902- 17 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1develop the integrated resource plan on behalf of the utility 2based on the proposals submitted.3    (g) Subject to appropriation, if a utility elects to rely 4on an expert or expert consulting firm selected by the Agency, 590% of the costs assessed by the expert for development of the 6integrated resource plan shall be paid by the Agency, up to 7$250,000, and the remainder paid by the utility. 8    Section 35. Electric cooperatives member access.9    (a) As used in this Section, "meeting" has the meaning 10given to that term in Section 1.02 of the Open Meetings Act.11    (b) As used in this Section, except for subsection (j), 12"member" includes all members of an electric cooperative in 13accordance with the cooperative's bylaws. Where a generation 14and transmission electric cooperative's members are electric 15cooperatives rather than individuals, members of those 16member-cooperatives are members of the generation and 17transmission electric cooperative for purposes of this 18Section. As used in subsection (j), "member" includes only 19members of an electric cooperative with individual members.20    (c) All meetings of an electric cooperative shall be open 21to all members, except that a cooperative, by a two-thirds 22affirmative vote of the board members present, may go into 23executive session for consideration of documents or 24information deemed to be confidential for legal, commercial, 25or personnel purposes.  HB2902- 18 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1        (1) Before a board of directors convenes in executive 2    session, the board shall announce the general topic of the 3    executive session.4        (2) Notice of all meetings of an electric cooperative 5    shall be posted on the website of the electric cooperative 6    at least 15 days prior to the meeting. Minutes of all 7    meetings of an electric cooperative shall be posted on the 8    website of the electric cooperative as soon as they have 9    been approved and shall remain posted for at least one 10    year after the date of the meeting. Upon request of a 11    member, the electric cooperative shall make minutes of any 12    meeting held after the effective date of this Act 13    available. Minutes shall include the votes of each member 14    of the board on all items for which approval was not 15    unanimous.16        (3) At every regular meeting of the governing body of 17    an electric cooperative, members of the cooperative shall 18    be given an opportunity to address the board on any matter 19    concerning the policies and businesses of the cooperative. 20    The board may place reasonable, viewpoint-neutral 21    restrictions on the amount and duration of member comment.22    (d) Each electric cooperative shall post on its website 23its current rates. The electric cooperative shall keep and 24make available to any member, upon request, all financial 25audits of the electric cooperative conducted in the last 3 26fiscal years.  HB2902- 19 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1    (e) Each electric cooperative shall adopt and post a 2written policy governing the election of directors on its 3website. The electric cooperative shall provide notice of the 4policy at the time a person becomes a member, as a bill insert 5at least once per year, and on request. The policy shall 6contain true and complete information on the following:7        (1) Who is entitled to vote in an election, including 8    how member-cooperatives may vote.9        (2) How a member may obtain and cast a ballot.10        (3) How a member may become a candidate for the board 11    or any other elected leadership positions.12    (f) At least 60 days before each board election, the 13electric cooperative shall post a list of candidates and 14deadline to return ballots on its website and leave the 15information posted until the election has concluded. The same 16information shall be included as part of a bill insert for a 17billing cycle occurring at no more than 60 but no fewer than 15 18days prior to the deadline to return ballots.19    (g) Each candidate for a position on the board of 20directors who has qualified under the electric cooperative's 21bylaws is entitled to receive a membership list in electronic 22format upon receipt and verification of any candidacy 23requirements. The membership list must include the names and 24addresses of all members as they appear in the electric 25cooperative's records.   HB2902- 20 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1    Section 40. Conflict of interest disclosures.2    (a) Each electric cooperative, municipality, and municipal 3power agency shall adopt, and post publicly on its website, 4written policies concerning:5        (1) The compensation provided to a director on the 6    board of directors, including information on any 7    authorized per diem amounts, and the values of other 8    benefits, services, or goods that a director receives.9        (2) The disclosure of any gifts received by a director 10    in excess of a de minimis amount.11        (3) The requirements and procedures for a director on 12    the board of directors to disclose in writing any 13    conflicts of interest. At a minimum, the policy must 14    require disclosure when a decision before the board could 15    provide directly and as a proximate result of the decision 16    a financial or other material benefit to:17            (A) The director, if the benefit is unique to that 18        director and not shared by similarly situated 19        cooperative members.20            (B) A parent, grandparent, spouse, partner in a 21        civil union, child, or sibling of the director, if the 22        benefit is unique to that director and not shared by 23        similarly situated cooperative members.24            (C) An entity in which the director is an officer 25        or director or has a financial interest not shared by 26        similarly situated cooperative members.  HB2902- 21 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1    (b) Each electric cooperative shall disclose on its 2website all lobbying activities as defined by Section 2 of the 3Lobbyist Registration Act and the amount of expenditures on 4such activities on an annual basis. Where the electric 5cooperative is a member of a trade association or other 6organization that engages in lobbying activities, the electric 7cooperative shall post the amount of dues or other 8expenditures paid by the cooperative to such an organization 9and what percentage of the organization or association's 10budget is spent on lobbying activities. 11    Section 45. The Open Meetings Act is amended by changing 12Section 2 as follows: 13    (5 ILCS 120/2)  (from Ch. 102, par. 42)14    Sec. 2. Open meetings. 15    (a) Openness required. All meetings of public bodies shall 16be open to the public unless excepted in subsection (c) and 17closed in accordance with Section 2a.18    (b) Construction of exceptions. The exceptions contained 19in subsection (c) are in derogation of the requirement that 20public bodies meet in the open, and therefore, the exceptions 21are to be strictly construed, extending only to subjects 22clearly within their scope. The exceptions authorize but do 23not require the holding of a closed meeting to discuss a 24subject included within an enumerated exception.  HB2902- 22 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1    (c) Exceptions. A public body may hold closed meetings to 2consider the following subjects:3        (1) The appointment, employment, compensation, 4    discipline, performance, or dismissal of specific 5    employees, specific individuals who serve as independent 6    contractors in a park, recreational, or educational 7    setting, or specific volunteers of the public body or 8    legal counsel for the public body, including hearing 9    testimony on a complaint lodged against an employee, a 10    specific individual who serves as an independent 11    contractor in a park, recreational, or educational 12    setting, or a volunteer of the public body or against 13    legal counsel for the public body to determine its 14    validity. However, a meeting to consider an increase in 15    compensation to a specific employee of a public body that 16    is subject to the Local Government Wage Increase 17    Transparency Act may not be closed and shall be open to the 18    public and posted and held in accordance with this Act.19        (2) Collective negotiating matters between the public 20    body and its employees or their representatives, or 21    deliberations concerning salary schedules for one or more 22    classes of employees.23        (3) The selection of a person to fill a public office, 24    as defined in this Act, including a vacancy in a public 25    office, when the public body is given power to appoint 26    under law or ordinance, or the discipline, performance or   HB2902- 23 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1    removal of the occupant of a public office, when the 2    public body is given power to remove the occupant under 3    law or ordinance. 4        (4) Evidence or testimony presented in open hearing, 5    or in closed hearing where specifically authorized by law, 6    to a quasi-adjudicative body, as defined in this Act, 7    provided that the body prepares and makes available for 8    public inspection a written decision setting forth its 9    determinative reasoning.10        (4.5) Evidence or testimony presented to a school 11    board regarding denial of admission to school events or 12    property pursuant to Section 24-24 of the School Code, 13    provided that the school board prepares and makes 14    available for public inspection a written decision setting 15    forth its determinative reasoning. 16        (5) The purchase or lease of real property for the use 17    of the public body, including meetings held for the 18    purpose of discussing whether a particular parcel should 19    be acquired.20        (6) The setting of a price for sale or lease of 21    property owned by the public body.22        (7) The sale or purchase of securities, investments, 23    or investment contracts. This exception shall not apply to 24    the investment of assets or income of funds deposited into 25    the Illinois Prepaid Tuition Trust Fund. 26        (8) Security procedures, school building safety and   HB2902- 24 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1    security, and the use of personnel and equipment to 2    respond to an actual, a threatened, or a reasonably 3    potential danger to the safety of employees, students, 4    staff, the public, or public property.5        (9) Student disciplinary cases.6        (10) The placement of individual students in special 7    education programs and other matters relating to 8    individual students.9        (11) Litigation, when an action against, affecting or 10    on behalf of the particular public body has been filed and 11    is pending before a court or administrative tribunal, or 12    when the public body finds that an action is probable or 13    imminent, in which case the basis for the finding shall be 14    recorded and entered into the minutes of the closed 15    meeting.16        (12) The establishment of reserves or settlement of 17    claims as provided in the Local Governmental and 18    Governmental Employees Tort Immunity Act, if otherwise the 19    disposition of a claim or potential claim might be 20    prejudiced, or the review or discussion of claims, loss or 21    risk management information, records, data, advice or 22    communications from or with respect to any insurer of the 23    public body or any intergovernmental risk management 24    association or self insurance pool of which the public 25    body is a member.26        (13) Conciliation of complaints of discrimination in   HB2902- 25 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1    the sale or rental of housing, when closed meetings are 2    authorized by the law or ordinance prescribing fair 3    housing practices and creating a commission or 4    administrative agency for their enforcement.5        (14) Informant sources, the hiring or assignment of 6    undercover personnel or equipment, or ongoing, prior or 7    future criminal investigations, when discussed by a public 8    body with criminal investigatory responsibilities.9        (15) Professional ethics or performance when 10    considered by an advisory body appointed to advise a 11    licensing or regulatory agency on matters germane to the 12    advisory body's field of competence.13        (16) Self evaluation, practices and procedures or 14    professional ethics, when meeting with a representative of 15    a statewide association of which the public body is a 16    member.17        (17) The recruitment, credentialing, discipline or 18    formal peer review of physicians or other health care 19    professionals, or for the discussion of matters protected 20    under the federal Patient Safety and Quality Improvement 21    Act of 2005, and the regulations promulgated thereunder, 22    including 42 C.F.R. Part 3 (73 FR 70732), or the federal 23    Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 24    1996, and the regulations promulgated thereunder, 25    including 45 C.F.R. Parts 160, 162, and 164, by a 26    hospital, or other institution providing medical care,   HB2902- 26 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1    that is operated by the public body.2        (18) Deliberations for decisions of the Prisoner 3    Review Board.4        (19) Review or discussion of applications received 5    under the Experimental Organ Transplantation Procedures 6    Act.7        (20) The classification and discussion of matters 8    classified as confidential or continued confidential by 9    the State Government Suggestion Award Board.10        (21) Discussion of minutes of meetings lawfully closed 11    under this Act, whether for purposes of approval by the 12    body of the minutes or semi-annual review of the minutes 13    as mandated by Section 2.06.14        (22) Deliberations for decisions of the State 15    Emergency Medical Services Disciplinary Review Board.16        (23) The operation by a municipality of a municipal 17    utility or the operation of a municipal power agency or 18    municipal natural gas agency when the discussion involves 19    (i) trade secrets, (ii) ongoing contract negotiations or 20    results of a request for proposals relating to the 21    purchase, sale, or delivery of electricity or natural gas 22    from nonaffiliate entities, or (iii) information 23    prohibited from disclosure by a regional transmission 24    organization to ensure the integrity of competitive 25    markets contracts relating to the purchase, sale, or 26    delivery of electricity or natural gas or (ii) the results   HB2902- 27 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1    or conclusions of load forecast studies.2        (24) Meetings of a residential health care facility 3    resident sexual assault and death review team or the 4    Executive Council under the Abuse Prevention Review Team 5    Act.6        (25) Meetings of an independent team of experts under 7    Brian's Law. 8        (26) Meetings of a mortality review team appointed 9    under the Department of Juvenile Justice Mortality Review 10    Team Act. 11        (27) (Blank). 12        (28) Correspondence and records (i) that may not be 13    disclosed under Section 11-9 of the Illinois Public Aid 14    Code or (ii) that pertain to appeals under Section 11-8 of 15    the Illinois Public Aid Code. 16        (29) Meetings between internal or external auditors 17    and governmental audit committees, finance committees, and 18    their equivalents, when the discussion involves internal 19    control weaknesses, identification of potential fraud risk 20    areas, known or suspected frauds, and fraud interviews 21    conducted in accordance with generally accepted auditing 22    standards of the United States of America.23        (30) (Blank). 24        (31) Meetings and deliberations for decisions of the 25    Concealed Carry Licensing Review Board under the Firearm 26    Concealed Carry Act.   HB2902- 28 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1        (32) Meetings between the Regional Transportation 2    Authority Board and its Service Boards when the discussion 3    involves review by the Regional Transportation Authority 4    Board of employment contracts under Section 28d of the 5    Metropolitan Transit Authority Act and Sections 3A.18 and 6    3B.26 of the Regional Transportation Authority Act.7        (33) Those meetings or portions of meetings of the 8    advisory committee and peer review subcommittee created 9    under Section 320 of the Illinois Controlled Substances 10    Act during which specific controlled substance prescriber, 11    dispenser, or patient information is discussed.12        (34) Meetings of the Tax Increment Financing Reform 13    Task Force under Section 2505-800 of the Department of 14    Revenue Law of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 15        (35) Meetings of the group established to discuss 16    Medicaid capitation rates under Section 5-30.8 of the 17    Illinois Public Aid Code. 18        (36) Those deliberations or portions of deliberations 19    for decisions of the Illinois Gaming Board in which there 20    is discussed any of the following: (i) personal, 21    commercial, financial, or other information obtained from 22    any source that is privileged, proprietary, confidential, 23    or a trade secret; or (ii) information specifically 24    exempted from the disclosure by federal or State law.25        (37) Deliberations for decisions of the Illinois Law 26    Enforcement Training Standards Board, the Certification   HB2902- 29 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1    Review Panel, and the Illinois State Police Merit Board 2    regarding certification and decertification. 3        (38) Meetings of the Ad Hoc Statewide Domestic 4    Violence Fatality Review Committee of the Illinois 5    Criminal Justice Information Authority Board that occur in 6    closed executive session under subsection (d) of Section 7    35 of the Domestic Violence Fatality Review Act. 8        (39) Meetings of the regional review teams under 9    subsection (a) of Section 75 of the Domestic Violence 10    Fatality Review Act. 11        (40) Meetings of the Firearm Owner's Identification 12    Card Review Board under Section 10 of the Firearm Owners 13    Identification Card Act. 14    (d) Definitions. For purposes of this Section:15    "Employee" means a person employed by a public body whose 16relationship with the public body constitutes an 17employer-employee relationship under the usual common law 18rules, and who is not an independent contractor.19    "Public office" means a position created by or under the 20Constitution or laws of this State, the occupant of which is 21charged with the exercise of some portion of the sovereign 22power of this State. The term "public office" shall include 23members of the public body, but it shall not include 24organizational positions filled by members thereof, whether 25established by law or by a public body itself, that exist to 26assist the body in the conduct of its business.  HB2902- 30 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1    "Quasi-adjudicative body" means an administrative body 2charged by law or ordinance with the responsibility to conduct 3hearings, receive evidence or testimony and make 4determinations based thereon, but does not include local 5electoral boards when such bodies are considering petition 6challenges.7    (e) Final action. No final action may be taken at a closed 8meeting. Final action shall be preceded by a public recital of 9the nature of the matter being considered and other 10information that will inform the public of the business being 11conducted. 12(Source: P.A. 102-237, eff. 1-1-22; 102-520, eff. 8-20-21; 13102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-311, eff. 147-28-23; 103-626, eff. 1-1-25.) 15    Section 50. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 16changing Sections 11-119.1-4 and 11-119.1-10 and by adding 17Section 11-119.1-5.5 as follows: 18    (65 ILCS 5/11-119.1-4)  (from Ch. 24, par. 11-119.1-4)19    Sec. 11-119.1-4. Municipal Power Agencies. 20    A. Any 2 or more municipalities, contiguous or 21noncontiguous, and which operate an electric utility system, 22may form a municipal power agency by the execution of an agency 23agreement authorized by an ordinance adopted by the governing 24body of each municipality. The agency agreement may state:  HB2902- 31 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1        (1) that the municipal power agency is created and 2    incorporated under the provisions of this Division as a 3    body politic and corporate, municipal corporation and unit 4    of local government of the State of Illinois;5        (2) the name of the agency and the date of its 6    establishment;7        (3) that names of the municipalities which have 8    adopted the agency agreement and constitute the initial 9    members of the municipal power agency;10        (4) the names and addresses of the persons initially 11    appointed in the ordinances adopting the agency agreement 12    to serve on the Board of Directors and act as the 13    representatives of the municipalities, respectively, in 14    the exercise of their powers as members;15        (5) the limitations, if any, upon the terms of office 16    of the directors, provided that such directors shall 17    always be selected and vacancies in their offices declared 18    and filled by ordinances adopted by the governing body of 19    the respective municipalities;20        (6) the location by city, village or incorporated town 21    in the State of Illinois of the principal office of the 22    municipal power agency;23        (7) provisions for the disposition, division or 24    distribution of obligations, property and assets of the 25    municipal power agency upon dissolution; and26        (8) any other provisions for regulating the business   HB2902- 32 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1    of the municipal power agency or the conduct of its 2    affairs which may be agreed to by the member 3    municipalities, consistent with this Division, including, 4    without limitation, any provisions for weighted voting 5    among the member municipalities or by the directors.6    B. The presiding officer of the Board of Directors of any 7municipal power agency established pursuant to this Division 8or such other officer selected by the Board of Directors, 9within 3 months after establishment, shall file a certified 10copy of the agency agreement and a list of the municipalities 11which have adopted the agreement with the recorder of deeds of 12the county in which the principal office is located. The 13recorder of deeds shall record this certified copy and list 14and shall immediately transmit the certified copy and list to 15the Secretary of State, together with his certificate of 16recordation. The Secretary of State shall file these documents 17and issue his certificate of approval over his signature and 18the Great Seal of the State. The Secretary of State shall make 19and keep a register of municipal power agencies established 20under this Division.21    C. Each municipality which becomes a member of the 22municipal power agency shall appoint a representative to serve 23on the Board of Directors, which representative may be a 24member of the governing body of the municipality. Each 25appointment shall be made by the mayor, or president, subject 26to the confirmation of the governing body. The directors so   HB2902- 33 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1appointed shall hold office for a term of 3 years, or until a 2successor has been duly appointed and qualified, except that 3the directors first appointed shall determine by lot at their 4initial meeting the respective directors which shall serve for 5a term of one, 2 or 3 years from the date of that meeting. A 6vacancy shall be filled for the balance of the unexpired term 7in the same manner as the original appointment.8    The Board of Directors is the corporate authority of the 9municipal power agency and shall exercise all the powers and 10manage and control all of the affairs and property of the 11agency. The Board of Directors shall have full power to pass 12all necessary ordinances, resolutions, rules and regulations 13for the proper management and conduct of the business of the 14board, and for carrying into effect the objects for which the 15agency was established.16    At the initial meeting of the Board of Directors to be held 17within 30 days after the date of establishment of the 18municipal power agency, the directors shall elect from their 19members a presiding officer to preside over the meetings of 20the Board of Directors and an alternative presiding officer 21and may elect an executive board. The Board of Directors shall 22determine and designate in the agency's bylaws the titles for 23the presiding officers. The directors shall also elect a 24secretary and treasurer, who need not be directors. The board 25may select such other officers, employees and agents as deemed 26to be necessary, who need not be directors or residents of any   HB2902- 34 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1of the municipalities which are members of the municipal power 2agency. The board may designate appropriate titles for all 3other officers, employees, and agents. All persons selected by 4the board shall hold their respective offices during the 5pleasure of the board, and give such bond as may be required by 6the board.7    D. The bylaws of the municipal power agency, and any 8amendments thereto, shall be adopted by the Board of Directors 9by a majority vote (adjusted for weighted voting, if provided 10in the Agency Agreement) to provide the following:11        (1) the conditions and obligations of membership, if 12    any;13        (2) the manner and time of calling regular and special 14    meetings of the Board of Directors;15        (3) the procedural rules of the Board of Directors;16        (4) the composition, powers and responsibilities of 17    any committee or executive board;18        (5) the rights and obligations of new members, 19    conditions for the termination of membership, including a 20    formula for the determination of required termination 21    payments, if any, and the disposition of rights and 22    obligations upon termination of membership; and23        (6) such other rules or provisions for regulating the 24    affairs of the municipal power agency as the board shall 25    determine to be necessary.26    E. Every municipal power agency shall maintain an office   HB2902- 35 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1in the State of Illinois to be known as its principal office. 2When a municipal power agency desires to change the location 3of such office, it shall file with the Secretary of State a 4certificate of change of location, stating the new address and 5the effective date of change. Meetings of the Board of 6Directors may be held at any place within the State of 7Illinois, designated by the Board of Directors, after notice. 8Unless otherwise provided by the bylaws, an act of the 9majority of the directors present at a meeting at which a 10quorum is present is the act of the Board of Directors.11    F. The Board of Directors shall hold at least one meeting 12each year for the election of officers and for the transaction 13of any other business. Special meetings of the Board of 14Directors may be called for any purpose upon written request 15to the presiding officer of the Board of Directors or 16secretary to call the meeting. Such officer shall give notice 17of the meeting to be held not less than 10 days and not more 18than 60 days after receipt of such request. Unless the bylaws 19provide for a different percentage, a quorum for a meeting of 20the Board of Directors is a majority of all members then in 21office. All meetings of the board shall be held in compliance 22with the provisions of "An Act in relation to meetings", 23approved July 11, 1957, as amended.24    G. The agency agreement may be amended as proposed at any 25meeting of the Board of Directors for which notice, stating 26the purpose, shall be given to each director and, unless the   HB2902- 36 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1bylaws prescribe otherwise, such amendment shall become 2effective when ratified by ordinances adopted by a majority of 3the governing bodies of the member municipalities. Each 4amendment, duly certified, shall be recorded and filed in the 5same manner as for the original agreement.6    H. Each member municipality shall have full power and 7authority, subject to the provisions of its charter and laws 8regarding local finance, to appropriate money for the payment 9of the expenses of the municipal power agency and of its 10representative in exercising its functions as a member of the 11municipal power agency.12    I. Any additional municipality which operates an electric 13utility system may join the municipal power agency, or any 14member municipality may withdraw therefrom consistent with the 15bylaws of the municipal power agency, and upon payment of any 16termination obligations as described in subsection D upon the 17approval by ordinance adopted by the governing body of the 18majority of the municipalities which are then members of the 19municipal power agency. Any new member shall agree to assume 20its proportionate share of the outstanding obligations of the 21municipal power agency and any member permitted to withdraw 22shall remain obligated to make payments under any outstanding 23contract or agreement with the municipal power agency or to 24comply with any exit or early termination provisions set forth 25in that contract or agreement. Any such change in membership 26shall be recorded and filed in the same manner as for the   HB2902- 37 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1original agreement.2    J. Any 2 or more municipal power agencies organized 3pursuant to this Division may consolidate to form a new 4municipal power agency when approved by ordinance adopted by 5the governing body of each municipality which is a member of 6the respective municipal power agency and by the execution of 7an agency agreement as provided in this Section.8(Source: P.A. 96-204, eff. 1-1-10.) 9    (65 ILCS 5/11-119.1-5.5 new)10    Sec. 11-119.1-5.5. Agency records, budgets, and quarterly 11reports.12    (a) A municipal power agency shall keep accurate accounts 13and records of its assets, liabilities, revenues, and 14expenditures in accordance with generally accepted accounting 15principles. Such accounts and records shall include, but are 16not limited to, depreciation, operating and maintenance 17expenses for all generation and transmission assets, fuel 18costs, cost and revenue from the purchase or sale of 19environmental compliance credits, revenue from energy, 20capacity, and ancillary market sales, all payments received 21from member municipalities, membership dues or other payments 22made to trade associations or industry organizations, and 23lobbying expenditures. Such records shall be audited on an 24annual basis by an independent auditor using generally 25accepted auditing standards and shall include contents as set   HB2902- 38 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1forth in Section 8-8-5, and shall be filed with the 2Comptroller as described by Section 8-8-7.3    (b) A municipal power agency shall, on an annual basis, 4prepare one-year and 5-year budgets that include all revenues 5and expenses, including, but not limited to, those categories 6described in subsection (a). As part of each one-year budget, 7the municipal power agency shall include a report identifying 8and explaining any variance from the previous annual budget of 95% or greater in any expenditure or revenue line item. Such 10budgets shall be provided to member municipalities no less 11than 60 days prior to any meeting of the municipal power agency 12during which action on the budget is or will be part of the 13agency agenda.14    (c) The municipal power agency shall post, on a publicly 15available website, all one-year and 5-year budgets required 16under subsection (b) and the annual audited financial 17statements required under subsection (a).18    (d) The municipal power agency shall make available, upon 19request to any of its member municipalities, access to all 20municipal power agency all records and accounts and all 21financial information relating to ownership and operation of 22agency assets and the generation, procurement, and delivery of 23electricity to which the agency has access, including, but not 24limited to, unit scheduling information, market revenue and 25off-system sales data, and fuel and other variable cost 26information. Such information shall be provided in a timely   HB2902- 39 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1manner and through reasonable means, and members shall be 2permitted to make copies of any documents retained solely by 3the agency. Such access shall be provided without regard to 4any nondisclosure agreement that has been or may be adopted by 5the municipal power agency.6    (e) The municipal power agency shall prepare, on a 7quarterly basis, a report to its member municipalities 8describing all expenditures made for the purpose of lobbying, 9as both terms are defined by Section 2 of the Lobbyist 10Registration Act, and a brief summary of the topics and 11positions on which lobbying activities were undertaken. Where 12the municipal power agency is a member of an organization or 13trade association that expends some or all of membership dues 14on lobbying activities, the municipal power agency shall 15include in this report the amount of those membership dues, 16what proportion of those dues were spent on lobbying 17activities, and the topics and positions on which lobbying 18activities were undertaken by the organization or trade 19association of which the municipal power agency is a member. 20    (65 ILCS 5/11-119.1-10)  (from Ch. 24, par. 11-119.1-10)21    Sec. 11-119.1-10. Exercise of powers. A municipal power 22agency may exercise any and all of the powers enumerated in 23this Division, except the power of eminent domain, without the 24consent and approval of the Illinois Commerce Commission. The 25exercise of the power of eminent domain by a municipal power   HB2902- 40 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1agency shall be subject to the consent and approval of the 2Illinois Commerce Commission in the same manner and to the 3same extent as public utilities under the Public Utilities 4Act, including the issuance of a certificate of public 5convenience and necessity as provided for in Section 8-406 of 6that Act. During the consideration of any petition for 7authority to exercise the power of eminent domain the Illinois 8Commerce Commission shall evaluate and give due consideration 9to whether the project for which eminent domain is sought is 10part of the preferred portfolio as described in subsection (d) 11of Section 15 of the Municipal and Cooperative Electric 12Utility Planning and Transparency Act, or least cost plans for 13procuring renewable resources as described in subsections (f) 14and (g) of Section 20 of the Municipal and Cooperative 15Electric Utility Planning and Transparency Act and to the 16impact of the acquisition on farmlands in the State with the 17goal of preserving the land to the fullest extent reasonably 18possible.19(Source: P.A. 90-416, eff. 1-1-98.) 20    Section 55. The Public Utilities Act is amended by 21changing Sections 16-107.5 and 17-500 as follows: 22    (220 ILCS 5/16-107.5)23    Sec. 16-107.5. Net electricity metering.24    (a) The General Assembly finds and declares that a program   HB2902- 41 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1to provide net electricity metering, as defined in this 2Section, for eligible customers can encourage private 3investment in renewable energy resources, stimulate economic 4growth, enhance the continued diversification of Illinois' 5energy resource mix, and protect the Illinois environment. 6Further, to achieve the goals of this Act that robust options 7for customer-site distributed generation continue to thrive in 8Illinois, the General Assembly finds that a predictable 9transition must be ensured for customers between full net 10metering at the retail electricity rate to the distribution 11generation rebate described in Section 16-107.6. 12    (b) As used in this Section, (i) "community renewable 13generation project" shall have the meaning set forth in 14Section 1-10 of the Illinois Power Agency Act; (ii) "eligible 15customer" means a retail customer that owns, hosts, or 16operates, including any third-party owned systems, a solar, 17wind, or other eligible renewable electrical generating 18facility that is located on the customer's premises or 19customer's side of the billing meter and is intended primarily 20to offset the customer's own current or future electrical 21requirements; (iii) "electricity provider" means an electric 22utility or alternative retail electric supplier; (iv) 23"eligible renewable electrical generating facility" means a 24generator, which may include the co-location of an energy 25storage system, that is interconnected under rules adopted by 26the Commission and is powered by solar electric energy, wind,   HB2902- 42 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1dedicated crops grown for electricity generation, agricultural 2residues, untreated and unadulterated wood waste, livestock 3manure, anaerobic digestion of livestock or food processing 4waste, fuel cells or microturbines powered by renewable fuels, 5or hydroelectric energy; (v) "net electricity metering" (or 6"net metering") means the measurement, during the billing 7period applicable to an eligible customer, of the net amount 8of electricity supplied by an electricity provider to the 9customer or provided to the electricity provider by the 10customer or subscriber; (vi) "subscriber" shall have the 11meaning as set forth in Section 1-10 of the Illinois Power 12Agency Act; (vii) "subscription" shall have the meaning set 13forth in Section 1-10 of the Illinois Power Agency Act; (viii) 14"energy storage system" means commercially available 15technology that is capable of absorbing energy and storing it 16for a period of time for use at a later time, including, but 17not limited to, electrochemical, thermal, and 18electromechanical technologies, and may be interconnected 19behind the customer's meter or interconnected behind its own 20meter; and (ix) "future electrical requirements" means modeled 21electrical requirements upon occupation of a new or vacant 22property, and other reasonable expectations of future 23electrical use, as well as, for occupied properties, a 24reasonable approximation of the annual load of 2 electric 25vehicles and, for non-electric heating customers, a reasonable 26approximation of the incremental electric load associated with   HB2902- 43 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1fuel switching. The approximations shall be applied to the 2appropriate net metering tariff and do not need to be unique to 3each individual eligible customer. The utility shall submit 4these approximations to the Commission for review, 5modification, and approval; and (x) "electricity provider" and 6"electric utility" includes municipalities and municipal power 7agencies as defined in Section 11-119.3-1 of the Illinois 8Municipal Code and electric cooperatives as defined in Section 93-119 of this Act.10    (c) A net metering facility shall be equipped with 11metering equipment that can measure the flow of electricity in 12both directions at the same rate.13        (1) For eligible customers whose electric service has 14    not been declared competitive pursuant to Section 16-113 15    of this Act as of July 1, 2011 and whose electric delivery 16    service is provided and measured on a kilowatt-hour basis 17    and electric supply service is not provided based on 18    hourly pricing, this shall typically be accomplished 19    through use of a single, bi-directional meter. If the 20    eligible customer's existing electric revenue meter does 21    not meet this requirement, the electricity provider shall 22    arrange for the local electric utility or a meter service 23    provider to install and maintain a new revenue meter at 24    the electricity provider's expense, which may be the smart 25    meter described by subsection (b) of Section 16-108.5 of 26    this Act.  HB2902- 44 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1        (2) For eligible customers whose electric service has 2    not been declared competitive pursuant to Section 16-113 3    of this Act as of July 1, 2011 and whose electric delivery 4    service is provided and measured on a kilowatt demand 5    basis and electric supply service is not provided based on 6    hourly pricing, this shall typically be accomplished 7    through use of a dual channel meter capable of measuring 8    the flow of electricity both into and out of the 9    customer's facility at the same rate and ratio. If such 10    customer's existing electric revenue meter does not meet 11    this requirement, then the electricity provider shall 12    arrange for the local electric utility or a meter service 13    provider to install and maintain a new revenue meter at 14    the electricity provider's expense, which may be the smart 15    meter described by subsection (b) of Section 16-108.5 of 16    this Act.17        (3) For all other eligible customers, until such time 18    as the local electric utility installs a smart meter, as 19    described by subsection (b) of Section 16-108.5 of this 20    Act, the electricity provider may arrange for the local 21    electric utility or a meter service provider to install 22    and maintain metering equipment capable of measuring the 23    flow of electricity both into and out of the customer's 24    facility at the same rate and ratio, typically through the 25    use of a dual channel meter. If the eligible customer's 26    existing electric revenue meter does not meet this   HB2902- 45 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1    requirement, then the costs of installing such equipment 2    shall be paid for by the customer. 3    (d) An electricity provider shall measure and charge or 4credit for the net electricity supplied to eligible customers 5or provided by eligible customers whose electric service has 6not been declared competitive pursuant to Section 16-113 of 7this Act as of July 1, 2011 and whose electric delivery service 8is provided and measured on a kilowatt-hour basis and electric 9supply service is not provided based on hourly pricing in the 10following manner:11        (1) If the amount of electricity used by the customer 12    during the billing period exceeds the amount of 13    electricity produced by the customer, the electricity 14    provider shall charge the customer for the net electricity 15    supplied to and used by the customer as provided in 16    subsection (e-5) of this Section.17        (2) If the amount of electricity produced by a 18    customer during the billing period exceeds the amount of 19    electricity used by the customer during that billing 20    period, the electricity provider supplying that customer 21    shall apply a 1:1 kilowatt-hour credit to a subsequent 22    bill for service to the customer for the net electricity 23    supplied to the electricity provider. The electricity 24    provider shall continue to carry over any excess 25    kilowatt-hour credits earned and apply those credits to 26    subsequent billing periods to offset any   HB2902- 46 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1    customer-generator consumption in those billing periods 2    until all credits are used or until the end of the 3    annualized period.4        (3) At the end of the year or annualized over the 5    period that service is supplied by means of net metering, 6    or in the event that the retail customer terminates 7    service with the electricity provider prior to the end of 8    the year or the annualized period, any remaining credits 9    in the customer's account shall expire.10    (d-5) An electricity provider shall measure and charge or 11credit for the net electricity supplied to eligible customers 12or provided by eligible customers whose electric service has 13not been declared competitive pursuant to Section 16-113 of 14this Act as of July 1, 2011 and whose electric delivery service 15is provided and measured on a kilowatt-hour basis and electric 16supply service is provided based on hourly pricing or 17time-of-use rates in the following manner:18        (1) If the amount of electricity used by the customer 19    during any hourly period or time-of-use period exceeds the 20    amount of electricity produced by the customer, the 21    electricity provider shall charge the customer for the net 22    electricity supplied to and used by the customer according 23    to the terms of the contract or tariff to which the same 24    customer would be assigned to or be eligible for if the 25    customer was not a net metering customer.26        (2) If the amount of electricity produced by a   HB2902- 47 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1    customer during any hourly period or time-of-use period 2    exceeds the amount of electricity used by the customer 3    during that hourly period or time-of-use period, the 4    energy provider shall apply a credit for the net 5    kilowatt-hours produced in such period. The credit shall 6    consist of an energy credit and a delivery service credit. 7    The energy credit shall be valued at the same price per 8    kilowatt-hour as the electric service provider would 9    charge for kilowatt-hour energy sales during that same 10    hourly period or time-of-use period. The delivery credit 11    shall be equal to the net kilowatt-hours produced in such 12    hourly period or time-of-use period times a credit that 13    reflects all kilowatt-hour based charges in the customer's 14    electric service rate, excluding energy charges. 15    (e) An electricity provider shall measure and charge or 16credit for the net electricity supplied to eligible customers 17whose electric service has not been declared competitive 18pursuant to Section 16-113 of this Act as of July 1, 2011 and 19whose electric delivery service is provided and measured on a 20kilowatt demand basis and electric supply service is not 21provided based on hourly pricing in the following manner:22        (1) If the amount of electricity used by the customer 23    during the billing period exceeds the amount of 24    electricity produced by the customer, then the electricity 25    provider shall charge the customer for the net electricity 26    supplied to and used by the customer as provided in   HB2902- 48 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1    subsection (e-5) of this Section. The customer shall 2    remain responsible for all taxes, fees, and utility 3    delivery charges that would otherwise be applicable to the 4    net amount of electricity used by the customer.5        (2) If the amount of electricity produced by a 6    customer during the billing period exceeds the amount of 7    electricity used by the customer during that billing 8    period, then the electricity provider supplying that 9    customer shall apply a 1:1 kilowatt-hour credit that 10    reflects the kilowatt-hour based charges in the customer's 11    electric service rate to a subsequent bill for service to 12    the customer for the net electricity supplied to the 13    electricity provider. The electricity provider shall 14    continue to carry over any excess kilowatt-hour credits 15    earned and apply those credits to subsequent billing 16    periods to offset any customer-generator consumption in 17    those billing periods until all credits are used or until 18    the end of the annualized period.19        (3) At the end of the year or annualized over the 20    period that service is supplied by means of net metering, 21    or in the event that the retail customer terminates 22    service with the electricity provider prior to the end of 23    the year or the annualized period, any remaining credits 24    in the customer's account shall expire.25    (e-5) An electricity provider shall provide electric 26service to eligible customers who utilize net metering at   HB2902- 49 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1non-discriminatory rates that are identical, with respect to 2rate structure, retail rate components, and any monthly 3charges, to the rates that the customer would be charged if not 4a net metering customer. An electricity provider shall not 5charge net metering customers any fee or charge or require 6additional equipment, insurance, or any other requirements not 7specifically authorized by interconnection standards 8authorized by the Commission, unless the fee, charge, or other 9requirement would apply to other similarly situated customers 10who are not net metering customers. The customer will remain 11responsible for all taxes, fees, and utility delivery charges 12that would otherwise be applicable to the net amount of 13electricity used by the customer. Subsections (c) through (e) 14of this Section shall not be construed to prevent an 15arms-length agreement between an electricity provider and an 16eligible customer that sets forth different prices, terms, and 17conditions for the provision of net metering service, 18including, but not limited to, the provision of the 19appropriate metering equipment for non-residential customers.20    (f) Notwithstanding the requirements of subsections (c) 21through (e-5) of this Section, an electricity provider must 22require dual-channel metering for customers operating eligible 23renewable electrical generating facilities to whom the 24provisions of neither subsection (d), (d-5), nor (e) of this 25Section apply. In such cases, electricity charges and credits 26shall be determined as follows:   HB2902- 50 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1        (1) The electricity provider shall assess and the 2    customer remains responsible for all taxes, fees, and 3    utility delivery charges that would otherwise be 4    applicable to the gross amount of kilowatt-hours supplied 5    to the eligible customer by the electricity provider.6        (2) Each month that service is supplied by means of 7    dual-channel metering, the electricity provider shall 8    compensate the eligible customer for any excess 9    kilowatt-hour credits at the electricity provider's 10    avoided cost of electricity supply over the monthly period 11    or as otherwise specified by the terms of a power-purchase 12    agreement negotiated between the customer and electricity 13    provider.14        (3) For all eligible net metering customers taking 15    service from an electricity provider under contracts or 16    tariffs employing hourly or time-of-use rates, any monthly 17    consumption of electricity shall be calculated according 18    to the terms of the contract or tariff to which the same 19    customer would be assigned to or be eligible for if the 20    customer was not a net metering customer. When those same 21    customer-generators are net generators during any discrete 22    hourly or time-of-use period, the net kilowatt-hours 23    produced shall be valued at the same price per 24    kilowatt-hour as the electric service provider would 25    charge for retail kilowatt-hour sales during that same 26    time-of-use period.   HB2902- 51 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1    (g) For purposes of federal and State laws providing 2renewable energy credits or greenhouse gas credits, the 3eligible customer shall be treated as owning and having title 4to the renewable energy attributes, renewable energy credits, 5and greenhouse gas emission credits related to any electricity 6produced by the qualified generating unit. The electricity 7provider may not condition participation in a net metering 8program on the signing over of a customer's renewable energy 9credits; provided, however, this subsection (g) shall not be 10construed to prevent an arms-length agreement between an 11electricity provider and an eligible customer that sets forth 12the ownership or title of the credits.13    (h) Within 120 days after the effective date of this 14amendatory Act of the 95th General Assembly, the Commission 15shall establish standards for net metering and, if the 16Commission has not already acted on its own initiative, 17standards for the interconnection of eligible renewable 18generating equipment to the utility system. The 19interconnection standards shall address any procedural 20barriers, delays, and administrative costs associated with the 21interconnection of customer-generation while ensuring the 22safety and reliability of the units and the electric utility 23system. The Commission shall consider the Institute of 24Electrical and Electronics Engineers (IEEE) Standard 1547 and 25the issues of (i) reasonable and fair fees and costs, (ii) 26clear timelines for major milestones in the interconnection   HB2902- 52 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1process, (iii) nondiscriminatory terms of agreement, and (iv) 2any best practices for interconnection of distributed 3generation.4    (h-5) Within 90 days after the effective date of this 5amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly, the Commission 6shall: 7        (1) establish an Interconnection Working Group. The 8    working group shall include representatives from electric 9    utilities, developers of renewable electric generating 10    facilities, other industries that regularly apply for 11    interconnection with the electric utilities, 12    representatives of distributed generation customers, the 13    Commission Staff, and such other stakeholders with a 14    substantial interest in the topics addressed by the 15    Interconnection Working Group. The Interconnection Working 16    Group shall address at least the following issues:17            (A) cost and best available technology for 18        interconnection and metering, including the 19        standardization and publication of standard costs;20            (B) transparency, accuracy and use of the 21        distribution interconnection queue and hosting 22        capacity maps;23            (C) distribution system upgrade cost avoidance 24        through use of advanced inverter functions;25            (D) predictability of the queue management process 26        and enforcement of timelines;  HB2902- 53 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1            (E) benefits and challenges associated with group 2        studies and cost sharing;3            (F) minimum requirements for application to the 4        interconnection process and throughout the 5        interconnection process to avoid queue clogging 6        behavior;7            (G) process and customer service for 8        interconnecting customers adopting distributed energy 9        resources, including energy storage;10            (H) options for metering distributed energy 11        resources, including energy storage;12            (I) interconnection of new technologies, including 13        smart inverters and energy storage;14            (J) collect, share, and examine data on Level 1 15        interconnection costs, including cost and type of 16        upgrades required for interconnection, and use this 17        data to inform the final standardized cost of Level 1 18        interconnection; and19            (K) such other technical, policy, and tariff 20        issues related to and affecting interconnection 21        performance and customer service as determined by the 22        Interconnection Working Group. 23        The Commission may create subcommittees of the 24    Interconnection Working Group to focus on specific issues 25    of importance, as appropriate. The Interconnection Working 26    Group shall report to the Commission on recommended   HB2902- 54 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1    improvements to interconnection rules and tariffs and 2    policies as determined by the Interconnection Working 3    Group at least every 6 months. Such reports shall include 4    consensus recommendations of the Interconnection Working 5    Group and, if applicable, additional recommendations for 6    which consensus was not reached. The Commission shall use 7    the report from the Interconnection Working Group to 8    determine whether processes should be commenced to 9    formally codify or implement the recommendations;10        (2) create or contract for an Ombudsman to resolve 11    interconnection disputes through non-binding arbitration. 12    The Ombudsman may be paid in full or in part through fees 13    levied on the initiators of the dispute; and14        (3) determine a single standardized cost for Level 1 15    interconnections, which shall not exceed $200. 16    (i) All electricity providers shall begin to offer net 17metering no later than April 1, 2008.18    (j) An electricity provider shall provide net metering to 19eligible customers according to subsections (d), (d-5), and 20(e). Eligible renewable electrical generating facilities for 21which eligible customers registered for net metering before 22January 1, 2025 shall continue to receive net metering 23services according to subsections (d), (d-5), and (e) of this 24Section for the lifetime of the system, regardless of whether 25those retail customers change electricity providers or whether 26the retail customer benefiting from the system changes. On and   HB2902- 55 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1after January 1, 2025, any eligible customer that applies for 2net metering and previously would have qualified under 3subsections (d), (d-5), or (e) shall only be eligible for net 4metering as described in subsection (n). 5    (k) Each electricity provider shall maintain records and 6report annually to the Commission the total number of net 7metering customers served by the provider, as well as the 8type, capacity, and energy sources of the generating systems 9used by the net metering customers. Nothing in this Section 10shall limit the ability of an electricity provider to request 11the redaction of information deemed by the Commission to be 12confidential business information.13    (l)(1) Notwithstanding the definition of "eligible 14customer" in item (ii) of subsection (b) of this Section, each 15electricity provider shall allow net metering as set forth in 16this subsection (l) and for the following projects, provided 17that only electric utilities serving more than 200,000 18customers as of January 1, 2021 shall provide net metering for 19projects that are eligible for subparagraph (C) of this 20paragraph (1) and have energized after the effective date of 21this amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly: 22        (A) properties owned or leased by multiple customers 23    that contribute to the operation of an eligible renewable 24    electrical generating facility through an ownership or 25    leasehold interest of at least 200 watts in such facility, 26    such as a community-owned wind project, a community-owned   HB2902- 56 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1    biomass project, a community-owned solar project, or a 2    community methane digester processing livestock waste from 3    multiple sources, provided that the facility is also 4    located within the utility's service territory; 5        (B) individual units, apartments, or properties 6    located in a single building that are owned or leased by 7    multiple customers and collectively served by a common 8    eligible renewable electrical generating facility, such as 9    an office or apartment building, a shopping center or 10    strip mall served by photovoltaic panels on the roof; and 11        (C) subscriptions to community renewable generation 12    projects, including community renewable generation 13    projects on the customer's side of the billing meter of a 14    host facility and partially used for the customer's own 15    load.16    In addition, the nameplate capacity of the eligible 17renewable electric generating facility that serves the demand 18of the properties, units, or apartments identified in 19paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection (l) shall not exceed 205,000 kilowatts in nameplate capacity in total. Any eligible 21renewable electrical generating facility or community 22renewable generation project that is powered by photovoltaic 23electric energy and installed after the effective date of this 24amendatory Act of the 99th General Assembly must be installed 25by a qualified person in compliance with the requirements of 26Section 16-128A of the Public Utilities Act and any rules or   HB2902- 57 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1regulations adopted thereunder.2    (2) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary, an 3electricity provider shall provide credits for the electricity 4produced by the projects described in paragraph (1) of this 5subsection (l). The electricity provider shall provide credits 6that include at least energy supply, capacity, transmission, 7and, if applicable, the purchased energy adjustment on the 8subscriber's monthly bill equal to the subscriber's share of 9the production of electricity from the project, as determined 10by paragraph (3) of this subsection (l). For customers with 11transmission or capacity charges not charged on a 12kilowatt-hour basis, the electricity provider shall prepare a 13reasonable approximation of the kilowatt-hour equivalent value 14and provide that value as a monetary credit. The electricity 15provider shall submit these approximation methodologies to the 16Commission for review, modification, and approval. 17Notwithstanding anything to the contrary, customers on payment 18plans or participating in budget billing programs shall have 19credits applied on a monthly basis. 20    (3) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary and 21regardless of whether a subscriber to an eligible community 22renewable generation project receives power and energy service 23from the electric utility or an alternative retail electric 24supplier, for projects eligible under paragraph (C) of 25subparagraph (1) of this subsection (l), electric utilities 26serving more than 200,000 customers as of January 1, 2021   HB2902- 58 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1shall provide the monetary credits to a subscriber's 2subsequent bill for the electricity produced by community 3renewable generation projects. The electric utility shall 4provide monetary credits to a subscriber's subsequent bill at 5the utility's total price to compare equal to the subscriber's 6share of the production of electricity from the project, as 7determined by paragraph (5) of this subsection (l). For the 8purposes of this subsection, "total price to compare" means 9the rate or rates published by the Illinois Commerce 10Commission for energy supply for eligible customers receiving 11supply service from the electric utility, and shall include 12energy, capacity, transmission, and the purchased energy 13adjustment. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary, 14customers on payment plans or participating in budget billing 15programs shall have credits applied on a monthly basis. Any 16applicable credit or reduction in load obligation from the 17production of the community renewable generating projects 18receiving a credit under this subsection shall be credited to 19the electric utility to offset the cost of providing the 20credit. To the extent that the credit or load obligation 21reduction does not completely offset the cost of providing the 22credit to subscribers of community renewable generation 23projects as described in this subsection, the electric utility 24may recover the remaining costs through its Multi-Year Rate 25Plan. All electric utilities serving 200,000 or fewer 26customers as of January 1, 2021 shall only provide the   HB2902- 59 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1monetary credits to a subscriber's subsequent bill for the 2electricity produced by community renewable generation 3projects if the subscriber receives power and energy service 4from the electric utility. Alternative retail electric 5suppliers providing power and energy service to a subscriber 6located within the service territory of an electric utility 7not subject to Sections 16-108.18 and 16-118 shall provide the 8monetary credits to the subscriber's subsequent bill for the 9electricity produced by community renewable generation 10projects.11    (4) If requested by the owner or operator of a community 12renewable generating project, an electric utility serving more 13than 200,000 customers as of January 1, 2021 shall enter into a 14net crediting agreement with the owner or operator to include 15a subscriber's subscription fee on the subscriber's monthly 16electric bill and provide the subscriber with a net credit 17equivalent to the total bill credit value for that generation 18period minus the subscription fee, provided the subscription 19fee is structured as a fixed percentage of bill credit value. 20The net crediting agreement shall set forth payment terms from 21the electric utility to the owner or operator of the community 22renewable generating project, and the electric utility may 23charge a net crediting fee to the owner or operator of a 24community renewable generating project that may not exceed 2% 25of the bill credit value. Notwithstanding anything to the 26contrary, an electric utility serving 200,000 customers or   HB2902- 60 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1fewer as of January 1, 2021 shall not be obligated to enter 2into a net crediting agreement with the owner or operator of a 3community renewable generating project. 4    (5) For the purposes of facilitating net metering, the 5owner or operator of the eligible renewable electrical 6generating facility or community renewable generation project 7shall be responsible for determining the amount of the credit 8that each customer or subscriber participating in a project 9under this subsection (l) is to receive in the following 10manner: 11        (A) The owner or operator shall, on a monthly basis, 12    provide to the electric utility the kilowatthours of 13    generation attributable to each of the utility's retail 14    customers and subscribers participating in projects under 15    this subsection (l) in accordance with the customer's or 16    subscriber's share of the eligible renewable electric 17    generating facility's or community renewable generation 18    project's output of power and energy for such month. The 19    owner or operator shall electronically transmit such 20    calculations and associated documentation to the electric 21    utility, in a format or method set forth in the applicable 22    tariff, on a monthly basis so that the electric utility 23    can reflect the monetary credits on customers' and 24    subscribers' electric utility bills. The electric utility 25    shall be permitted to revise its tariffs to implement the 26    provisions of this amendatory Act of the 102nd General   HB2902- 61 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1    Assembly. The owner or operator shall separately provide 2    the electric utility with the documentation detailing the 3    calculations supporting the credit in the manner set forth 4    in the applicable tariff. 5        (B) For those participating customers and subscribers 6    who receive their energy supply from an alternative retail 7    electric supplier, the electric utility shall remit to the 8    applicable alternative retail electric supplier the 9    information provided under subparagraph (A) of this 10    paragraph (3) for such customers and subscribers in a 11    manner set forth in such alternative retail electric 12    supplier's net metering program, or as otherwise agreed 13    between the utility and the alternative retail electric 14    supplier. The alternative retail electric supplier shall 15    then submit to the utility the amount of the charges for 16    power and energy to be applied to such customers and 17    subscribers, including the amount of the credit associated 18    with net metering. 19        (C) A participating customer or subscriber may provide 20    authorization as required by applicable law that directs 21    the electric utility to submit information to the owner or 22    operator of the eligible renewable electrical generating 23    facility or community renewable generation project to 24    which the customer or subscriber has an ownership or 25    leasehold interest or a subscription. Such information 26    shall be limited to the components of the net metering   HB2902- 62 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1    credit calculated under this subsection (l), including the 2    bill credit rate, total kilowatthours, and total monetary 3    credit value applied to the customer's or subscriber's 4    bill for the monthly billing period. 5    (l-5) Within 90 days after the effective date of this 6amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly, each electric 7utility subject to this Section shall file a tariff or tariffs 8to implement the provisions of subsection (l) of this Section, 9which shall, consistent with the provisions of subsection (l), 10describe the terms and conditions under which owners or 11operators of qualifying properties, units, or apartments may 12participate in net metering. The Commission shall approve, or 13approve with modification, the tariff within 120 days after 14the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 102nd General 15Assembly. 16    (m) Nothing in this Section shall affect the right of an 17electricity provider to continue to provide, or the right of a 18retail customer to continue to receive service pursuant to a 19contract for electric service between the electricity provider 20and the retail customer in accordance with the prices, terms, 21and conditions provided for in that contract. Either the 22electricity provider or the customer may require compliance 23with the prices, terms, and conditions of the contract. 24    (n) On and after January 1, 2025, the net metering 25services described in subsections (d), (d-5), and (e) of this 26Section shall no longer be offered, except as to those   HB2902- 63 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1eligible renewable electrical generating facilities for which 2retail customers are receiving net metering service under 3these subsections at the time the net metering services under 4those subsections are no longer offered; those systems shall 5continue to receive net metering services described in 6subsections (d), (d-5), and (e) of this Section for the 7lifetime of the system, regardless of if those retail 8customers change electricity providers or whether the retail 9customer benefiting from the system changes. The electric 10utility serving more than 200,000 customers as of January 1, 112021 is responsible for ensuring the billing credits continue 12without lapse for the lifetime of systems, as required in 13subsection (o). Those retail customers that begin taking net 14metering service after the date that net metering services are 15no longer offered under such subsections shall be subject to 16the provisions set forth in the following paragraphs (1) 17through (3) of this subsection (n):18        (1) An electricity provider shall charge or credit for 19    the net electricity supplied to eligible customers or 20    provided by eligible customers whose electric supply 21    service is not provided based on hourly pricing in the 22    following manner:23            (A) If the amount of electricity used by the 24        customer during the monthly billing period exceeds the 25        amount of electricity produced by the customer, then 26        the electricity provider shall charge the customer for   HB2902- 64 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1        the net kilowatt-hour based electricity charges 2        reflected in the customer's electric service rate 3        supplied to and used by the customer as provided in 4        paragraph (3) of this subsection (n).5            (B) If the amount of electricity produced by a 6        customer during the monthly billing period exceeds the 7        amount of electricity used by the customer during that 8        billing period, then the electricity provider 9        supplying that customer shall apply a 1:1 10        kilowatt-hour energy or monetary credit kilowatt-hour 11        supply charges to the customer's subsequent bill. The 12        customer shall choose between 1:1 kilowatt-hour or 13        monetary credit at the time of application. For the 14        purposes of this subsection, "kilowatt-hour supply 15        charges" means the kilowatt-hour equivalent values for 16        energy, capacity, transmission, and the purchased 17        energy adjustment, if applicable. Notwithstanding 18        anything to the contrary, customers on payment plans 19        or participating in budget billing programs shall have 20        credits applied on a monthly basis. The electricity 21        provider shall continue to carry over any excess 22        kilowatt-hour or monetary energy credits earned and 23        apply those credits to subsequent billing periods. For 24        customers with transmission or capacity charges not 25        charged on a kilowatt-hour basis, the electricity 26        provider shall prepare a reasonable approximation of   HB2902- 65 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1        the kilowatt-hour equivalent value and provide that 2        value as a monetary credit. The electricity provider 3        shall submit these approximation methodologies to the 4        Commission for review, modification, and approval.5            (C) (Blank).6        (2) An electricity provider shall charge or credit for 7    the net electricity supplied to eligible customers or 8    provided by eligible customers whose electric supply 9    service is provided based on hourly pricing in the 10    following manner:11            (A) If the amount of electricity used by the 12        customer during any hourly period exceeds the amount 13        of electricity produced by the customer, then the 14        electricity provider shall charge the customer for the 15        net electricity supplied to and used by the customer 16        as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection (n).17            (B) If the amount of electricity produced by a 18        customer during any hourly period exceeds the amount 19        of electricity used by the customer during that hourly 20        period, the energy provider shall calculate an energy 21        credit for the net kilowatt-hours produced in such 22        period, and shall apply that credit as a monetary 23        credit to the customer's subsequent bill. The value of 24        the energy credit shall be calculated using the same 25        price per kilowatt-hour as the electric service 26        provider would charge for kilowatt-hour energy sales   HB2902- 66 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1        during that same hourly period and shall also include 2        values for capacity and transmission. For customers 3        with transmission or capacity charges not charged on a 4        kilowatt-hour basis, the electricity provider shall 5        prepare a reasonable approximation of the 6        kilowatt-hour equivalent value and provide that value 7        as a monetary credit. The electricity provider shall 8        submit these approximation methodologies to the 9        Commission for review, modification, and approval. 10        Notwithstanding anything to the contrary, customers on 11        payment plans or participating in budget billing 12        programs shall have credits applied on a monthly 13        basis. 14        (3) An electricity provider shall provide electric 15    service to eligible customers who utilize net metering at 16    non-discriminatory rates that are identical, with respect 17    to rate structure, retail rate components, and any monthly 18    charges, to the rates that the customer would be charged 19    if not a net metering customer. An electricity provider 20    shall charge the customer for the net electricity supplied 21    to and used by the customer according to the terms of the 22    contract or tariff to which the same customer would be 23    assigned or be eligible for if the customer was not a net 24    metering customer. An electricity provider shall not 25    charge net metering customers any fee or charge or require 26    additional equipment, insurance, or any other requirements   HB2902- 67 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1    not specifically authorized by interconnection standards 2    authorized by the Commission, unless the fee, charge, or 3    other requirement would apply to other similarly situated 4    customers who are not net metering customers. The customer 5    remains responsible for the gross amount of delivery 6    services charges, supply-related charges that are kilowatt 7    based, and all taxes and fees related to such charges. The 8    customer also remains responsible for all taxes and fees 9    that would otherwise be applicable to the net amount of 10    electricity used by the customer. Paragraphs (1) and (2) 11    of this subsection (n) shall not be construed to prevent 12    an arms-length agreement between an electricity provider 13    and an eligible customer that sets forth different prices, 14    terms, and conditions for the provision of net metering 15    service, including, but not limited to, the provision of 16    the appropriate metering equipment for non-residential 17    customers. Nothing in this paragraph (3) shall be 18    interpreted to mandate that a utility that is only 19    required to provide delivery services to a given customer 20    must also sell electricity to such customer. 21    (o) Within 90 days after the effective date of this 22amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly, each electric 23utility subject to this Section shall file a tariff, which 24shall, consistent with the provisions of this Section, propose 25the terms and conditions under which a customer may 26participate in net metering. The tariff for electric utilities   HB2902- 68 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1serving more than 200,000 customers as of January 1, 2021 2shall also provide a streamlined and transparent bill 3crediting system for net metering to be managed by the 4electric utilities. The terms and conditions shall include, 5but are not limited to, that an electric utility shall manage 6and maintain billing of net metering credits and charges 7regardless of if the eligible customer takes net metering 8under an electric utility or alternative retail electric 9supplier. The electric utility serving more than 200,000 10customers as of January 1, 2021 shall process and approve all 11net metering applications, even if an eligible customer is 12served by an alternative retail electric supplier; and the 13utility shall forward application approval to the appropriate 14alternative retail electric supplier. Eligibility for net 15metering shall remain with the owner of the utility billing 16address such that, if an eligible renewable electrical 17generating facility changes ownership, the net metering 18eligibility transfers to the new owner. The electric utility 19serving more than 200,000 customers as of January 1, 2021 20shall manage net metering billing for eligible customers to 21ensure full crediting occurs on electricity bills, including, 22but not limited to, ensuring net metering crediting begins 23upon commercial operation date, net metering billing transfers 24immediately if an eligible customer switches from an electric 25utility to alternative retail electric supplier or vice versa, 26and net metering billing transfers between ownership of a   HB2902- 69 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1valid billing address. All transfers referenced in the 2preceding sentence shall include transfer of all banked 3credits. All electric utilities serving 200,000 or fewer 4customers as of January 1, 2021 shall manage net metering 5billing for eligible customers receiving power and energy 6service from the electric utility to ensure full crediting 7occurs on electricity bills, ensuring net metering crediting 8begins upon commercial operation date, net metering billing 9transfers immediately if an eligible customer switches from an 10electric utility to alternative retail electric supplier or 11vice versa, and net metering billing transfers between 12ownership of a valid billing address. Alternative retail 13electric suppliers providing power and energy service to 14eligible customers located within the service territory of an 15electric utility serving 200,000 or fewer customers as of 16January 1, 2021 shall manage net metering billing for eligible 17customers to ensure full crediting occurs on electricity 18bills, including, but not limited to, ensuring net metering 19crediting begins upon commercial operation date, net metering 20billing transfers immediately if an eligible customer switches 21from an electric utility to alternative retail electric 22supplier or vice versa, and net metering billing transfers 23between ownership of a valid billing address. 24(Source: P.A. 102-662, eff. 9-15-21.) 25    (220 ILCS 5/17-500)  HB2902- 70 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1    Sec. 17-500. Jurisdiction. Except as provided in the 2Electric Supplier Act, the Illinois Municipal Code, the 3Municipal and Cooperative Electric Utility Planning and 4Transparency Act, and this Article XVII, the Commission, or 5any other agency or subdivision thereof of the State of 6Illinois or any private entity shall have no jurisdiction over 7any electric cooperative or municipal system regardless of 8whether any election or elections as provided for herein have 9been made, and all control regarding an electric cooperative 10or municipal system shall be vested in the electric 11cooperative's board of directors or trustees or the applicable 12governing body of the municipal system.13(Source: P.A. 90-561, eff. 12-16-97.) 14    Section 60. The Eminent Domain Act is amended by changing 15Section 5-5-5 as follows: 16    (735 ILCS 30/5-5-5)17    Sec. 5-5-5. Exercise of the power of eminent domain; 18public use; blight. 19    (a) In addition to all other limitations and requirements, 20a condemning authority may not take or damage property by the 21exercise of the power of eminent domain unless it is for a 22public use, as set forth in this Section.23    (a-5) Subsections (b), (c), (d), (e), and (f) of this 24Section do not apply to the acquisition of property under the   HB2902- 71 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1O'Hare Modernization Act. A condemning authority may exercise 2the power of eminent domain for the acquisition or damaging of 3property under the O'Hare Modernization Act as provided for by 4law in effect prior to the effective date of this Act.5    (a-10) Subsections (b), (c), (d), (e), and (f) of this 6Section do not apply to the acquisition or damaging of 7property in furtherance of the goals and objectives of an 8existing tax increment allocation redevelopment plan. A 9condemning authority may exercise the power of eminent domain 10for the acquisition of property in furtherance of an existing 11tax increment allocation redevelopment plan as provided for by 12law in effect prior to the effective date of this Act.13    As used in this subsection, "existing tax increment 14allocation redevelopment plan" means a redevelopment plan that 15was adopted under the Tax Increment Allocation Redevelopment 16Act (Article 11, Division 74.4 of the Illinois Municipal Code) 17prior to April 15, 2006 and for which property assembly costs 18were, before that date, included as a budget line item in the 19plan or described in the narrative portion of the plan as part 20of the redevelopment project, but does not include (i) any 21additional area added to the redevelopment project area on or 22after April 15, 2006, (ii) any subsequent extension of the 23completion date of a redevelopment plan beyond the estimated 24completion date established in that plan prior to April 15, 252006, (iii) any acquisition of property in a conservation area 26for which the condemnation complaint is filed more than 12   HB2902- 72 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1years after the effective date of this Act, or (iv) any 2acquisition of property in an industrial park conservation 3area.4    As used in this subsection, "conservation area" and 5"industrial park conservation area" have the same meanings as 6under Section 11-74.4-3 of the Illinois Municipal Code.7    (b) If the exercise of eminent domain authority is to 8acquire property for public ownership and control, then the 9condemning authority must prove that (i) the acquisition of 10the property is necessary for a public purpose and (ii) the 11acquired property will be owned and controlled by the 12condemning authority or another governmental entity.13    (c) Except when the acquisition is governed by subsection 14(b) or is primarily for one of the purposes specified in 15subsection (d), (e), or (f) and the condemning authority 16elects to proceed under one of those subsections, if the 17exercise of eminent domain authority is to acquire property 18for private ownership or control, or both, then the condemning 19authority must prove by clear and convincing evidence that the 20acquisition of the property for private ownership or control 21is (i) primarily for the benefit, use, or enjoyment of the 22public and (ii) necessary for a public purpose.23    An acquisition of property primarily for the purpose of 24the elimination of blight is rebuttably presumed to be for a 25public purpose and primarily for the benefit, use, or 26enjoyment of the public under this subsection.  HB2902- 73 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1    Any challenge to the existence of blighting factors 2alleged in a complaint to condemn under this subsection shall 3be raised within 6 months of the filing date of the complaint 4to condemn, and if not raised within that time the right to 5challenge the existence of those blighting factors shall be 6deemed waived.7    Evidence that the Illinois Commerce Commission has granted 8a certificate or otherwise made a finding of public 9convenience and necessity for an acquisition of property (or 10any right or interest in property) for private ownership or 11control (including, without limitation, an acquisition for 12which the use of eminent domain is authorized under the Public 13Utilities Act, the Telephone Company Act, or the Electric 14Supplier Act) to be used for utility purposes creates a 15rebuttable presumption that such acquisition of that property 16(or right or interest in property) is (i) primarily for the 17benefit, use, or enjoyment of the public and (ii) necessary 18for a public purpose.19    In the case of an acquisition of property (or any right or 20interest in property) for private ownership or control to be 21used for utility, pipeline, or railroad purposes for which no 22certificate or finding of public convenience and necessity by 23the Illinois Commerce Commission is required, evidence that 24the acquisition is one for which the use of eminent domain is 25authorized under one of the following laws creates a 26rebuttable presumption that the acquisition of that property   HB2902- 74 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1(or right or interest in property) is (i) primarily for the 2benefit, use, or enjoyment of the public and (ii) necessary 3for a public purpose:4        (1) the Public Utilities Act,5        (2) the Telephone Company Act,6        (3) the Electric Supplier Act,7        (4) the Railroad Terminal Authority Act,8        (5) the Grand Avenue Railroad Relocation Authority 9    Act,10        (6) the West Cook Railroad Relocation and Development 11    Authority Act,12        (7) Section 4-505 of the Illinois Highway Code,13        (8) Section 17 or 18 of the Railroad Incorporation 14    Act,15        (9) Section 18c-7501 of the Illinois Vehicle Code.16    (d) If the exercise of eminent domain authority is to 17acquire property for private ownership or control and if the 18primary basis for the acquisition is the elimination of blight 19and the condemning authority elects to proceed under this 20subsection, then the condemning authority must: (i) prove by a 21preponderance of the evidence that acquisition of the property 22for private ownership or control is necessary for a public 23purpose; (ii) prove by a preponderance of the evidence that 24the property to be acquired is located in an area that is 25currently designated as a blighted area or conservation area 26under an applicable statute; (iii) if the existence of blight   HB2902- 75 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1or blighting factors is challenged in an appropriate motion 2filed within 6 months after the date of filing of the complaint 3to condemn, prove by a preponderance of the evidence that the 4required blighting factors existed in the area so designated 5(but not necessarily in the particular property to be 6acquired) at the time of the designation under item (ii) or at 7any time thereafter; and (iv) prove by a preponderance of the 8evidence at least one of the following:9        (A) that it has entered into an express written 10    agreement in which a private person or entity agrees to 11    undertake a development project within the blighted area 12    that specifically details the reasons for which the 13    property or rights in that property are necessary for the 14    development project;15        (B) that the exercise of eminent domain power and the 16    proposed use of the property by the condemning authority 17    are consistent with a regional plan that has been adopted 18    within the past 5 years in accordance with Section 5-14001 19    of the Counties Code or Section 11-12-6 of the Illinois 20    Municipal Code or with a local land resource management 21    plan adopted under Section 4 of the Local Land Resource 22    Management Planning Act; or23        (C) that (1) the acquired property will be used in the 24    development of a project that is consistent with the land 25    uses set forth in a comprehensive redevelopment plan 26    prepared in accordance with the applicable statute   HB2902- 76 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1    authorizing the condemning authority to exercise the power 2    of eminent domain and is consistent with the goals and 3    purposes of that comprehensive redevelopment plan, and (2) 4    an enforceable written agreement, deed restriction, or 5    similar encumbrance has been or will be executed and 6    recorded against the acquired property to assure that the 7    project and the use of the property remain consistent with 8    those land uses, goals, and purposes for a period of at 9    least 40 years, which execution and recording shall be 10    included as a requirement in any final order entered in 11    the condemnation proceeding.12    The existence of an ordinance, resolution, or other 13official act designating an area as blighted is not prima 14facie evidence of the existence of blight. A finding by the 15court in a condemnation proceeding that a property or area has 16not been proven to be blighted does not apply to any other case 17or undermine the designation of a blighted area or 18conservation area or the determination of the existence of 19blight for any other purpose or under any other statute, 20including without limitation under the Tax Increment 21Allocation Redevelopment Act (Article 11, Division 74.4 of the 22Illinois Municipal Code).23    Any challenge to the existence of blighting factors 24alleged in a complaint to condemn under this subsection shall 25be raised within 6 months of the filing date of the complaint 26to condemn, and if not raised within that time the right to   HB2902- 77 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1challenge the existence of those blighting factors shall be 2deemed waived.3    (e) If the exercise of eminent domain authority is to 4acquire property for private ownership or control and if the 5primary purpose of the acquisition is one of the purposes 6specified in item (iii) of this subsection and the condemning 7authority elects to proceed under this subsection, then the 8condemning authority must prove by a preponderance of the 9evidence that: (i) the acquisition of the property is 10necessary for a public purpose; (ii) an enforceable written 11agreement, deed restriction, or similar encumbrance has been 12or will be executed and recorded against the acquired property 13to assure that the project and the use of the property remain 14consistent with the applicable purpose specified in item (iii) 15of this subsection for a period of at least 40 years, which 16execution and recording shall be included as a requirement in 17any final order entered in the condemnation proceeding; and 18(iii) the acquired property will be one of the following:19        (1) included in the project site for a residential 20    project, or a mixed-use project including residential 21    units, where not less than 20% of the residential units in 22    the project are made available, for at least 15 years, by 23    deed restriction, long-term lease, regulatory agreement, 24    extended use agreement, or a comparable recorded 25    encumbrance, to low-income households and very low-income 26    households, as defined in Section 3 of the Illinois   HB2902- 78 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1    Affordable Housing Act;2        (2) used primarily for public airport, road, parking, 3    or mass transportation purposes and sold or leased to a 4    private party in a sale-leaseback, lease-leaseback, or 5    similar structured financing;6        (3) owned or used by a public utility or electric 7    cooperative for utility purposes;8        (4) owned or used by a railroad for passenger or 9    freight transportation purposes;10        (5) sold or leased to a private party that operates a 11    water supply, waste water, recycling, waste disposal, 12    waste-to-energy, or similar facility;13        (6) sold or leased to a not-for-profit corporation 14    whose purposes include the preservation of open space, the 15    operation of park space, and similar public purposes;16        (7) used as a library, museum, or related facility, or 17    as infrastructure related to such a facility;18        (8) used by a private party for the operation of a 19    charter school open to the general public; or20        (9) a historic resource, as defined in Section 3 of 21    the Illinois State Agency Historic Resources Preservation 22    Act, a landmark designated as such under a local 23    ordinance, or a contributing structure within a local 24    landmark district listed on the National Register of 25    Historic Places, that is being acquired for purposes of 26    preservation or rehabilitation.  HB2902- 79 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1    (f) If the exercise of eminent domain authority is to 2acquire property for public ownership and private control and 3if the primary purpose of the acquisition is one of the 4purposes specified in item (iii) of this subsection and the 5condemning authority elects to proceed under this subsection, 6then the condemning authority must prove by a preponderance of 7the evidence that: (i) the acquisition of the property is 8necessary for a public purpose; (ii) the acquired property 9will be owned by the condemning authority or another 10governmental entity; and (iii) the acquired property will be 11controlled by a private party that operates a business or 12facility related to the condemning authority's operation of a 13university, medical district, hospital, exposition or 14convention center, mass transportation facility, or airport, 15including, but not limited to, a medical clinic, research and 16development center, food or commercial concession facility, 17social service facility, maintenance or storage facility, 18cargo facility, rental car facility, bus facility, taxi 19facility, flight kitchen, fixed based operation, parking 20facility, refueling facility, water supply facility, and 21railroad tracks and stations.22    (f-5) For all acquisitions governed by subsection (c) 23where the property, or any right or interest in property, is to 24be used for utility purposes, and where the condemning 25authority is an entity required to submit an integrated 26resource plan under the Municipal and Cooperative Electric   HB2902- 80 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1Utility Planning and Transparency Act, the rebuttable 2presumption described in subsection (c) shall only apply if 3the most recent integrated resource plan filed by the 4condemning authority identified the facility or articulated a 5need for a facility of similar capacity and type to the 6facility for which the property or right or interest is 7sought. 8    (g) This Article is a limitation on the exercise of the 9power of eminent domain, but is not an independent grant of 10authority to exercise the power of eminent domain.11(Source: P.A. 94-1055, eff. 1-1-07.) 12    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 13becoming law.  HB2902- 81 -LRB104 09457 AAS 19518 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    New Act4    5 ILCS 120/2from Ch. 102, par. 425    65 ILCS 5/11-119.1-4from Ch. 24, par. 11-119.1-46    65 ILCS 5/11-119.1-5.5 new7    65 ILCS 5/11-119.1-10from Ch. 24, par. 11-119.1-108    220 ILCS 5/16-107.59    220 ILCS 5/17-50010    735 ILCS 30/5-5-5